Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 10. Indemnification.

§ 13.1-696.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Corporation”
includes any corporation and any domestic or foreign predecessor entity of a corporation in a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

“Director”
or

“officer”

means an individual who is or was a director or officer, respectively, of a corporation or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another entity or employee benefit plan. A director or officer is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if the individual’s duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the individual to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” or “officer” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director or officer.

“Liability”
means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including any excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, or expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding.

“Official capacity”
means (i) when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation and (ii) when used with respect to an officer, as contemplated in §

13.1-702

, the office in a corporation held by the officer. “Official capacity” does not include service for any other entity or employee benefit plan.

“Party”
means an individual who was, is, or is threatened to be made a defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding”
means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, arbitrative, or investigative and whether formal or informal.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2009, c. 587; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in the first paragraph, inserted “corporation and any domestic” preceding “or foreign predecessor” and inserted “domestic” preceding “corporation”; in the first sentence of the second paragraph, inserted “or officer, respectively” following “or was a director,” deleted “or an individual” following “of a corporation,” inserted “manager” preceding “partner, trustee,” inserted “limited liability company” preceding “partnership, joint venture,” substituted “or other entity” for “or other enterprise,” and inserted “or officer” throughout the paragraph; in the first sentence of the fifth paragraph, substituted “officer” for “individual other than a director,” and deleted “or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation” at the end, and in the second sentence, substituted “entity” for “enterprise”; and substituted “means” for “includes” in the sixth paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 587, effective retroactive to July 1, 2005, substituted “corporation or who” for “corporation who” in the first sentence of the paragraph defining “Director” or “officer.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in the definition for “Corporation,” deleted “domestic” preceding “corporation” twice; in the definition for “Director,” substituted “entity or employee benefit plan” for “foreign or domestic corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other entity,” substituted “the individual’s” for “his” and made a related change; deleted the definition for “Expenses,” which read: “’Expenses’ includes counsel fees”; in the definition for “Liability,” deleted “reasonable” preceding “expenses”; in the definition for “Official capacity,” substituted “entity or employee benefit plan” for “foreign or domestic corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other entity”; and in the definition for “Party,” deleted “named” preceding “defendant”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-697.
Authority to indemnify.

Except as provided in subsection D, a corporation may indemnify an individual who is a party to a proceeding because the individual is or was a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

The director:

Conducted himself in good faith; and

Believed:

In the case of conduct in his official capacity with the corporation, that his conduct was in its best interests; and

In all other cases, that his conduct was at least not opposed to its best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful; or

The director engaged in conduct for which broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory as authorized by subsection C of §

13.1-704

.

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose he believed to be in the interests of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subdivision A 1 b (2).

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, or conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the relevant standard of conduct described in this section.

Unless ordered by a court under subsection C of §

13.1-700.1

or broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory as authorized by subsection C of §

13.1-704

, a corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation except for expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding if it is determined that the director has met the relevant standard under subsection A; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging improper personal benefit to the director, whether or not involving action in his official capacity, in which he was adjudged liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by him.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, deleted “of this section” following “subsection D” and added “the director” to the end; deleted “He” at the beginning of subdivisions A 1 and A 2; deleted “of subsection A of this section” at the end of subsection B; inserted “or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent” following “settlement or conviction” in subsection C; substituted “Unless ordered by a court under subsection C of §

13.1-700.1

, a” for “A“ at the beginning of subsection D; substituted “except for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding if it is determined that the director has met the relevant standard under subsection A” for “in which the director was adjudged liable to the corporation” in subdivision D 1; and deleted subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “who is” for “made,” substituted “the individual” for “he” in subdivision A 1, inserted the subdivision A 1 a designation and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; added subdivision A 2; in subsection D, inserted “or broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory as authorized by subsection C of §

13.1-704

”; in subdivision D 1, deleted “reasonable” preceding “expenses”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-698.
Mandatory indemnification.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the director was a party because the director is or was a director of the corporation against expenses incurred by the director in connection with the proceeding.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section, which read: “Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who entirely prevails in the defense of any proceeding to which he was a party because he is or was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by him in connection with the proceeding.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 41 (2011).

§ 13.1-699.
Advance for expenses.

A corporation may, before final disposition of a proceeding, advance funds to pay for or reimburse the expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding by a director who is a party to a proceeding because the individual is a director if the director delivers to the corporation a signed written undertaking to repay any funds advanced if (i) the director is not entitled to mandatory indemnification under §

13.1-698

and (ii) it is ultimately determined under §

13.1-700.1

or

13.1-701

that the director is not entitled to indemnification.

The undertaking required by subsection A shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to the financial ability of the director to make repayment.

Authorizations under this section shall be made by:

The board of directors:

If there are two or more disinterested directors, by a majority vote of all the disinterested directors, a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum, or by a majority of the members of a committee consisting solely of two or more disinterested directors appointed by such a vote; or

If there are fewer than two disinterested directors, by the vote necessary for action by the board of directors in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-688

, in which authorization directors who do not qualify as disinterested directors may participate; or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time does not qualify as a disinterested director may not be voted on the authorization.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 added “and” to the end of subdivision A 1; substituted the language beginning “any funds advanced” for “the advance it is ultimately determined that he did not meet the standard of conduct; and” in subdivision A 2; deleted subdivision A 3; deleted “of subsection A of this section” following “by subsection A 2” in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “Authorizations” for “Determinations and” at the beginning, and substituted “by” for “in the manner specified in § 13.701” at the end; and added subdivisions C 1 through C 2.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 inserted “signed” preceding ’‘written” in subdivisions A 1 and A 2.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 deleted former subdivision A 1, which read “The director furnishes the corporation a signed written statement of his good faith belief that he has met the standard of conduct described in §

13.1-697

” and made related changes; substituted “subsection A” for “subdivision A 2” in subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “the financial ability of the director” for “financial ability”; in subsection C, deleted “of payments” preceding “under this”; in subdivision C 1 a, inserted “consisting solely”; and in subdivision C 1 b, inserted “of directors” following “board”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-700.
Repealed by Acts 1987, cc. 59, 257.

Cross references.

As to limitation on liability of officers and directors, see §

13.1-692.1

.

As to court orders for advances, reimbursement or indemnification, see §

13.1-700.1

.

§ 13.1-700.1.
Court orders for advance, reimbursement, or indemnification.

An individual who is a party to a proceeding because he is a director of the corporation may apply for indemnification or an advance of expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After receipt of an application and after giving any notice it considers necessary, the court shall:

Order indemnification if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under §

13.1-698

;

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses pursuant to a provision authorized by §

13.1-704

; or

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines, in view of all the relevant circumstances, that it is fair and reasonable (i) to indemnify the director or (ii) to advance expenses to the director, even if, in the case of clause (i) or (ii), the director has not met the relevant standard of conduct set forth in subsection A of §

13.1-697

, failed to comply with §

13.1-699

, or was adjudged liable in a proceeding referred to in subsection D of §

13.1-697

, but if the director was adjudged so liable, indemnification shall be limited to expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification under subdivision A 1 or to indemnification or advance for expenses under subdivision A 2, it shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s expenses incurred in connection with obtaining court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses. If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under subdivision A 3, it may also order the corporation to pay the director’s expenses to obtain court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses.

Neither (i) the failure of the corporation, including its board of directors, its independent legal counsel and its shareholders, to have made a determination prior to the commencement of any action permitted by this section that the applying director is entitled to receive an advance, reimbursement, or indemnification nor (ii) the determination by the corporation, including its board of directors, its independent legal counsel and its shareholders, that the applying director is not entitled to receive an advance, reimbursement, or indemnification shall create a presumption to that effect or otherwise of itself be a defense to that director’s application for an advance for expenses, reimbursement, or indemnification.

History.

1987, cc. 59, 257; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to indemnification under the Virginia Business Trust Act, see §

13.1-1230

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, deleted “or was” preceding “a director of” and substituted “the” for “a” following “a director of.”

§ 13.1-701.
Determination and authorization of indemnification.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under §

13.1-697

unless authorized for a specific proceeding after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible because the director has met the relevant standard of conduct set forth in §

13.1-697

.

The determination shall be made:

If there are two or more disinterested directors, by the board of directors by a majority vote of all the disinterested directors, a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum, or by a majority of the members of a committee of two or more disinterested directors appointed by such a vote;

By special legal counsel:

Selected in the manner prescribed in subdivision 1; or

If there are fewer than two disinterested directors, selected by the board of directors, in which selection directors who do not qualify as disinterested directors may participate; or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time does not qualify as a disinterested director may not be voted on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if there are fewer than two disinterested directors or if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification shall be made by those entitled to select special legal counsel under subdivision B 2.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, deleted “in the circumstances” following “is permissible” and inserted “relevant” preceding “standard”; in subdivision B 1, added “If there are two or more disinterested directors” at the beginning and deleted “a quorum consisting of directors not at,” inserted “all,” and deleted “time parties to the proceeding”; rewrote subdivision B 2 and redesignated it as part of subdivision B 1; redesignated former subdivision B 3 as present subdivision B 2; in present subdivision B 2 a, deleted “by the board of directors or its committee” at the beginning,
and substituted “in subdivision 1” for “in subdivisions 1 and 2”; rewrote present subdivision B 2 b; in present subdivision B 3, substituted “a director who at the time does not quality as a disinterested director” for “of directors who are at the time parties to the preceding”; and in subsection C, deleted “and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses” following “Authorization of indemnification,” inserted “there are fewer than two disinterested directors or if”
preceding “the determination is made,” deleted “and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses” preceding “shall be made by those entitled,” and substituted “subdivision B 2 to select counsel” for “subdivision 3 b 2 of subsection B of this section to select counsel” at the end.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “for a specific proceeding” for “in the specific case,” and substituted “the director” for “he”; in subdivision B 2 a, deleted “of this subsection”; and in subsection C, substituted “entitled to select special legal counsel under subdivision B 2” for “entitled under subdivision B 2 to select counsel.”

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-702.
Advance for expenses and indemnification for officers.

Unless limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation:

An officer of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding because he is an officer is entitled to mandatory indemnification under §

13.1-698

and is entitled to apply for court-ordered advance or reimbursement of expenses and indemnification under §

13.1-700.1

, in each case to the same extent as a director; and

The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under this article to an officer who is a party to a proceeding because the individual is an officer to the same extent as to a director.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “employee, or agent” following “to an officer” in subdivision 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision 1, inserted “who is a party to a proceeding because he is an officer” and inserted “advance or reimbursement of expenses and”; and in subdivision 2, substituted “who is a party to a proceeding because the individual is an officer” for “of the corporation.”

§ 13.1-703.
Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a director or officer of the corporation, or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual in that capacity or arising from the individual’s status as a director or officer, regardless of whether the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to the individual against the same liability under this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “director or officer of the corporation” for “director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation” twice; inserted “limited liability company” following “domestic corporation,” and substituted “entity, against officer” for “enterprise against officer, employee, or agent,” and made other minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 deleted “foreign or domestic corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other” preceding “entity”; substituted “the individual” for “him” and made a related change; and substituted “regardless of whether the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to the individual against the same liability under this article” for “whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under §

13.1-697

or

13.1-698

.”

§ 13.1-704.
Application of article.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws expressly provide otherwise, any authorization of indemnification or advances or reimbursement of expenses in the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall not be deemed to prevent the corporation from providing indemnity or advances or reimbursement of expenses permitted or mandated by this article.

A corporation, by a provision in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or in a resolution adopted or a contract approved by the board of directors or shareholders, may obligate itself in advance of the act or omission giving rise to a proceeding to provide indemnification in accordance with §

13.1-697

or subsection C and advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with §

13.1-699

. Any such obligatory provision shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements for authorization referred to in subsection C of §

13.1-699

and subsection C of §

13.1-701

.

Any corporation shall have power to make any further indemnity, including indemnity with respect to a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, and to make additional provision for advances and reimbursement of expenses, to any director or officer that may be authorized by the articles of incorporation or any bylaw made by the shareholders or any resolution adopted, before or after the event, by the shareholders, except an indemnity against (i) his willful misconduct or (ii) a knowing violation of criminal law. Any such provision that obligates the corporation to provide indemnification to the fullest extent permitted by law shall be deemed, unless the articles of incorporation or any such bylaw or resolution expressly provides otherwise, also to obligate the corporation to advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses to the fullest extent permitted by law in accordance with §

13.1-699

except that the applicable standard shall be conduct that does not constitute willful misconduct or a knowing violation of criminal law, rather than the standard of conduct prescribed in §

13.1-697

. Unless the articles of incorporation, or any such bylaw or resolution expressly provide otherwise, any determination as to the right to any further indemnity shall be made in accordance with subsection B of §

13.1-701

. Each such indemnity may continue as to a person who has ceased to have the capacity referred to above and may inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of such a person.

A right of indemnification or advance for expenses created under this article or under subsection B and in effect at the time of an act or omission shall not be reduced, eliminated, or impaired by any amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders adopted after the occurrence of such act or omission unless, in the case of a right created under subsection B, the provision creating such right and in effect at the time of such act or omission explicitly authorizes such reduction, elimination, or impairment after such act or omission has occurred.

Any provision pursuant to subsection B shall not obligate the corporation to indemnify or advance expenses to a director of a predecessor of the corporation, pertaining to conduct with respect to the predecessor, unless otherwise expressly provided. Any provision for indemnification or advance for expenses in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders of a predecessor of the corporation in a merger or in a contract to which the predecessor is a party, existing at the time the merger takes effect, shall be governed by subdivision A 4 of §

13.1-721

.

This article does not limit a corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director or an officer in connection with his or her appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he or she is not a party.

This article does not limit a corporation’s power to provide indemnity to, advance or reimburse expenses incurred by, or provide or maintain insurance on behalf of an agent or an employee who is not a director or officer.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-3.1; 1968, c. 570; 1975, c. 500; 1979, c. 99; 1985, c. 522; 1987, cc. 59, 257; 1988, c. 561; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection B, substituted “director or officer” for “director, officer, employee or agent” in the first sentence, and substituted “subsection B of §

13.1-701

” for “§

13.1-701

B” at the end of the second sentence; and added subsections D and E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 inserted “or advances or reimbursement of expenses” twice in subsection A, substituted “to provide indemnity to, advance or reimburse expenses incurred by, or” for “to indemnify, advance expenses to or” and
“an agent or an employee” for “an employee or agent” in subsection E, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 added the last two sentences in subsection A; and inserted the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 redesignated the former second paragraph of subsection A as subsection B; in subsection B, inserted “or subsection C” preceding “and advance”; rewrote subsection D; added subsection E; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).